South Dakota, session 2026, SB136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated from the general fund $5,000,000 to the Department of
Public Safety, for the purpose of providing grants for the purchase of personal protective
equipment worn or used by firefighters in the performance of their duties with fire
departments in this state that have at least seventy percent of their firefighters serving in a
volunteer status.
Section 2. The Department of Public Safety shall consider completed applications
chronologically, and shall prioritize grants to those departments indicating the greatest need
for equipment to support the safety and well-being of the firefighters.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2030, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.787.18 2 136
An Act to make an appropriation for grants to support the purchase of personal protective
equipment by volunteer fire departments and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 136
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 136 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB136 ENROLLED